Louisiana, session 2026, HB566.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 39:77.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§77.1. Prohibition on use of state funds for certain climate initiatives
A. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms shall have the
following meanings unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Net-zero greenhouse gas emissions goals" means any objective aimed
at achieving net-zero greenhouse gas emissions by a particular date or within a
particular timeframe, as outlined in the Climate Initiatives Task Force's February
2022 Louisiana Climate Action Plan, including but not limited to:
(a) Alignment with the Paris Climate Agreement, Intergovernmental Panel
on Climate Change guidelines, or other international climate mandates.
(b) Promotion of renewable energy transitions, electric vehicle incentives,
equity-focused policies, federal tax credits for emissions reductions, or regulatory
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-628 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 566
expansions on methane or other elements identified in the Plan as contributing to
net-zero emissions.
(c) Any policies or actions that promote a reduction in greenhouse gas
emissions to net zero, such as those involving clean energy transitions, methane
management, environment changes, or related economic strategies.
(2) "State funds" means any monies appropriated by the state, except where
federal law mandates expenditure without state discretion.
B. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no state agency,
department, board, commission, or other state entity shall allocate, expend, or
otherwise obligate any state funds for any program, initiative, activity, project, or
expenditure that is directly tied to or supports the achievement of net-zero
greenhouse gas emissions goals.
C. This Section shall not apply to:
(1) Expenditures required to comply with federal laws, regulations, or court
orders that predate the effective date of this Act and are not discretionary.
(2) Obligations under contracts or agreements entered into prior to the
effective date of this Act.
(3) Expenditures related to incentives for reduction of pollutants or harmful
chemicals as identified by the Department of Environmental Quality.
(4) Emergency expenditures necessary for public health, safety, or disaster
response, provided they are not primarily aimed at achieving net-zero goals.
D.(1) Any citizen with knowledge of an alleged violation of this Section may
institute a civil action against the public entity to enjoin the violation. Any such
action shall be filed in the district court of the judicial district in which the state
capitol is located. The information upon which the action is based shall be obtained
independently and shall not be based upon any of the following:
(a) A disclosure of allegations or transactions in a criminal, civil, or
administrative hearing or as the result of disclosure of a governmental audit report,
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-628 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 566
investigation, or hearing, unless the citizen bringing the action has independent
knowledge of the alleged violation.
(b) A disclosure through the news media, unless the citizen bringing the
action has independent knowledge of the alleged violation.
(2) In addition to an order enjoining violation of this Section, the court shall
award to a successful principal plaintiff costs and reasonable attorney fees. The
court shall also award to any prevailing defendant costs and reasonable attorney fees.
However, if a public entity depends upon the written opinion of the attorney general
that the action taken by the public entity is in compliance with the provisions of this
Section, the public entity shall not be liable for the costs and attorney fees of the
adverse party.
E. This Section shall apply to state funds appropriated for fiscal years
beginning on or after July 1, 2026, and shall become null and void on January 1,
2031.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.